Hawaii, session 2026, HB1693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  Section 225P-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Considering both atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gas emissions as well as offsets from the local sequestration of atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gases through long-term sinks and reservoirs, a statewide target [is hereby] shall be established to sequester more atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gases than emitted within the State as quickly as practicable, but no later than [2045;] 2050; provided that the statewide target [includes] shall include a greenhouse gas emissions limit, to be achieved no later than 2030, of at least fifty per cent below the level of the statewide greenhouse gas emissions in 2005." PART II SECTION 2.  Section 225P-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§225P-5 Zero emissions clean economy target. (a)  Considering both atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gas emissions as well as offsets from the local sequestration of atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gases through long-term sinks and reservoirs, a statewide target [is hereby] shall be established to sequester more atmospheric carbon and greenhouse gases than emitted within the State as quickly as practicable, but no later than 2045; provided that the statewide target [includes] shall include a greenhouse gas emissions limit, to be achieved no later than 2030, of at least fifty per cent below the level of the statewide greenhouse gas emissions in 2005. (b)  The Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission shall endeavor to achieve the goals of this section.  After January 1, 2020, agency plans, decisions, and strategies shall give consideration to the impact of those plans, decisions, and strategies on the State's ability to achieve the goals in this section, weighed appropriately against their primary purpose. (c)  This section shall not apply to the department of transportation or to any transportation system or service." PART III SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________